Tennessee statutes. Title 32 Wills
Chapter 2

Probate of Wills

32-2-101. Place of proving and recording will and granting letters testamentary.

Wills shall be proved and recorded and letters testamentary granted in the probate court of the county where the testator had the testator's usual residence at the time of the testator's death, or, in case the testator had fixed places of residence in more than one county, in either or any of those counties.

Code 1858, § 2169 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 23, § 1); Shan., § 3902; mod. Code 1932, § 8099; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-201.

Cross-References. Destruction or concealment of will, §39-14-131.

Fees of clerks of courts administering probate matters, §§8-21-401,8-21-701,8-21-702.

Foreign probated wills, allowing and recording, §32-5-101.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, ch. 16, part 2.

Letters testamentary, granting, §30-1-102.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 32, 313, 315, 528, 538.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-801, 4-803.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Conflict of Laws, Domicile and Residence, § 27; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 45.

Law Reviews.

Notice to Interested Parties in Probate Proceedings, 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1647 (1965).

32-2-102. Original will — Where kept — Transfer of will — Record of transfer.

Except when a will is before the court awaiting the determination of any controversy, an original will must remain in the clerk's office of the county where the will is proved or exhibited, or other suitable facility as provided in subsection (b), and any person may have access to it, as to other records.

The clerk may transfer, as provided in subdivision (b)(2), all original wills in the clerk's possession for which at least three (3) years have elapsed since final settlement of the estate or final disposition of all actions involving the will.

A will transferred pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) must be transferred to a county archive facility or any other suitable facility that:

Stores local government records;

Is secure from theft and natural disasters; and

Has been approved by the judge of the respective court and the county public records commission.

For the purposes of subsection (b), “final disposition” means that judgment has been entered and the appeal times have lapsed for all parties.

The clerk of the court shall keep a record of each will that is transferred pursuant to subsection (b). The record must indicate the name of the testator, the date of transfer, and the location to which the will was transferred.

Code 1858, § 2170 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 49); Shan., § 3903; Code 1932, § 8100; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-202; Acts 2019, ch. 79, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “Every original will shall remain in the clerk's office of the county where it is proved or exhibited, among the records of that office, except when it is before another court awaiting the determination of any controversy, and any person may have access to it, as to other records.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 79, § 4. April 3, 2019.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 321.

32-2-103. Withdrawal of will for proof out of state.

Whenever any will has been proved and recorded for six (6) months in any county of this state, as required by §§32-2-101 —32-2-104, and the will is required to be proved out of this state, the judge of probate may, on the application of the executor, so stating, duly sworn to and filed, allow the executor to withdraw the will, upon leaving a photostatic and certified copy and complying with such other terms as may be prescribed.

Code 1932, § 8101; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-203.

32-2-104. Proof of will generally.

Written wills with witnesses, when not contested, shall be proved by at least one of the subscribing witnesses, if living. Every last will and testament, written or nuncupative, when contested, shall be proved by all the living witnesses, if to be found, and by such other persons as may be produced to support it.

Upon petition of any interested party, the court, in its discretion, may permit the proof of any subscribing witness who is outside of the state or county or who is unable to testify in person, to be taken by interrogatories or deposition in the same manner as provided in chancery cases. For the purpose of taking interrogatories or depositions a photostatic copy of the original will may be furnished to the witness, or in the discretion of the court, the original will may be withdrawn and used in the manner prescribed by § 32-2-103.

Code 1858, §§ 2171, 2172 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 23, § 1); Shan., § 3904; Code 1932, § 8102; C. Supp. 1950, § 8102; Acts 1953, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-204.

Cross-References. Affidavit of witnesses to prove will, §32-2-110.

Proof of written will, evidence, §32-4-105.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 319, 320, 332, 334, 372, 1044.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-802.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 12, 49, 74.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (Herman L. Trautman), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 882 (1962).

Impeachment of Witnesses In Tennessee (Donald F. Paine), 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 728 (1969).

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Wills, Trusts and Estates — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1238 (1957).

32-2-105. Proof of will of person serving in armed forces.

Any last will of any person in the military or naval service of the United States, made outside this state, or at sea while in military or naval service, may be admitted to probate by the probate court of the county where the testator was domiciled, upon the certificate of the colonel, lieutenant colonel, major, or commanding officer of the regiment, or captain or commandant of the vessel, setting forth that the testator acknowledged, or that the subscribing witnesses proved, the will before that officer; but the heirs or next of kin of the testator may, in like manner and time prescribed for other contests, contest the validity of the will, in which case the authentication shall be prima facie evidence.

The will of any person serving in the armed forces of the United States or any auxiliary thereto and executed while serving therein, may be admitted to probate upon proof satisfactory to the tribunal having jurisdiction over the probate of the genuineness of the signature of the maker of the will, where it first be shown that proof of due execution of the will may not be had of the subscribing witnesses to the will, if any, due to the inability to locate them, their death or the unavailability of their testimony for any reason adjudged sufficient by the tribunal having jurisdiction over the probate.

However, no such will shall be admitted to probate where the will is offered for probate more than ten (10) years from the date of a declaration by the president of the United States or a resolution of congress declaring the end of hostilities during which the will was executed and in which the testator was a member of the armed forces, and nothing provided in this subsection (b) with reference to such wills shall void modes of probating wills made by members of the armed forces, but this subsection (b) shall, as to the wills of members of the armed forces made as provided in this section, afford an additional method of probate.

Code 1858, §§ 2191, 2192 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 82, § 2); Shan., §§ 3923, 3924; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8129, 8130; Acts 1945, ch. 24, §§ 1-4; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8102; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 32-205, 32-206.

Cross-References. Will contest, title 32, ch. 4.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 32, 59.

Collateral References.

What circumstances excuse failure to submit will for probate within time limit set by statute. 17 A.L.R.3d 1361.

32-2-106. Proof of nuncupative will.

No nuncupative will shall be proved until fourteen (14) days after the death of the testator, nor until process has issued to call in the surviving spouse or next of kin, or both, if conveniently to be found, to contest it.

If the surviving spouse and next of kin, or any of them, are not so found or are out of the state, notice shall be given by publication, once a week for four (4) successive weeks, in some newspaper published in the county, or, if none is published in the county, in the one (1) published nearest the courthouse of the county, and this notice shall be a prerequisite to the establishment of the will; also, if residence be known, by mailing a copy of the notice to them at that address by registered mail.

Code 1858, § 2166 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Apr.), ch. 22, § 16); Shan., § 3899; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8095, 8096; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-207.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 9, 231, 241, 316, 329.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 81.

32-2-107. Effect of probate.

The probate of wills in the probate courts shall be sufficient evidence of the devise of real estates.

Code 1858, § 2197 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Oct.), ch. 10, § 6); Shan., § 3929; Code 1932, § 8139; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-208.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 32, 332.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 44, 50.

32-2-108. Copies of wills as evidence.

Attested or certified copies of wills, or the records thereof, by the proper officer, may be given in evidence in the same manner as the originals.

Code 1858, § 2198 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Oct.), ch. 10, § 6); Shan., § 3930; mod. Code 1932, § 8140; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-209.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 16, 371.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 49, 50, 54, 56.

32-2-109. Original — When to be produced.

When any fraud is suggested to have been committed in the drawing or obtaining of any last will, or any irregularity in the executing or attestation of the will, the party making the suggestion may insist upon the original will being produced to the court, if the original is to be found.

The court, wherever any suit is pending, and in which such a domestic will may be introduced as testimony, may compel all and every person or persons, whether in office or otherwise, to produce the will.

Code 1858, §§ 2199, 2200 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Oct.), ch. 10, § 6); Shan., §§ 3931, 3932; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8141, 8142; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-210.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 322.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 9, 44, 49.

32-2-110. Affidavit of witnesses to prove will.

Any or all of the attesting witnesses to any will may, at the request of the testator or, after the testator's death, at the request of the executor or any person interested under the will, make and sign an affidavit before any officer authorized to administer oaths in or out of this state, stating the facts to which they would be required to testify in court to prove the will, which affidavit shall be written on the will or, if that is impracticable, on some paper attached to the will, and the sworn statement of any such witness so taken shall be accepted by the court of probate when the will is not contested as if it had been taken before the court.

Acts 1972, ch. 568, § 1; T.C.A., § 32-211.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 318, 319, 332, 1035, 1036.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-509, 4-510, 4-802, 4-803.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 11, 12, 49.

Law Reviews.

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

32-2-111. Admission to probate for establishing a muniment of title to real estate and personal property.

Regardless of the date of the person's death and any limitation on the time for admitting a will for probate, any will when duly proven, whether of a resident or nonresident decedent, may be admitted to probate for the limited purpose of establishing a muniment of title to real estate and personal property, without the necessity of granting letters testamentary or otherwise proceeding with administration.

Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 19; 2002, ch. 735, § 7; 2007, ch. 8, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that this section shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.